Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-250
Town clerk; budget; prepare.

The town clerk in counties under township organization shall proceed to prepare the township budget as prescribed in the Nebraska Budget Act.

Laws 1913, c. 54, § 1, p. 160;

R.S.1913, § 1034;

C.S.1922, § 936;

C.S.1929, § 26-250;

R.S.1943, § 23-250;

Laws 1951, c. 49, § 2, p. 166;

Laws 1953, c. 52, § 1, p. 180;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 10;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 16;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 16;

Laws 2002, LB 568, § 8.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.